Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3177.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law, or rule or regulation to the contrary, section
3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended in subdivision (4) by inserting after the third paragraph the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if a retirement board accepts payment from a member for
the purchase of out-of-state service and issues to the member an estimate of the creditable
service to be granted thereby, such payment shall be deemed validly accepted and the member
shall be credited with the years of service so estimated for all purposes of this chapter. A
subsequent determination that the member may have been entitled to a retirement allowance
from another state shall not operate to divest the member of such creditable service, provided
that the board had accepted payment at the time of the estimate.
of 1